Wisconsin, session 2025, AB972.
do enact as follows:AB972,11Section 1. 224.45 (1) (af) and (am) of the statutes are created to read:AB972,2,22224.45 (1) (af) “Adult-at-risk agency” has the meaning given in s. 55.01 (1f).AB972,2,33(am) “Elder-adult-at-risk agency” has the meaning given in s. 46.90 (1) (bt).AB972,24Section 2. 224.45 (1) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:AB972,2,75224.45 (1) (c) “Financial institution” means a bank, savings bank, savings and 6loan association, trust company, or credit union chartered under the laws of this 7state has the meaning given in s. 214.01 (1) (jn).AB972,38Section 3. 224.45 (1) (dc) and (dm) of the statutes are created to read:AB972,2,109224.45 (1) (dc) “Financial transaction” means any of the following as 10applicable to the business of, or services provided by, a financial service provider:AB972,2,12111. A transfer or disbursement of, or request to transfer or disburse, funds or 12assets in an account.AB972,2,14132. A request to initiate a wire transfer, initiate an automated clearinghouse 14transfer, or issue a money order, cashier’s check, or teller’s check.AB972,2,15153. A request to negotiate a check or other negotiable instrument.AB972,2,16164. A request to change the ownership of an account.AB972,2,17175. A request for a loan or other extension of credit or to draw on a line of credit.AB972,2,19186. A request to modify a loan or other extension of credit or add an authorized 19signer on a line of credit.AB972,2,20207. A request to issue a debit card or initiate a debit card transaction.AB972,3,2218. A request to transfer the title to any real property, manufactured home, or 1motor vehicle, or to encumber any real property, manufactured home, or motor 2vehicle.AB972,3,33(dm) “Law enforcement agency” has the meaning given in s. 165.77 (1) (b).AB972,44Section 4. 224.45 (3) and (4) of the statutes are created to read:AB972,3,105224.45 (3) Financial service providers may refuse or delay 6transactions. (a) Notwithstanding any provision of ch. 403, 404, or 410, if a 7financial service provider has reasonable cause to suspect that financial 8exploitation of a vulnerable adult may have occurred, may have been attempted, or 9is being attempted, the financial service provider may, but is not required to, refuse 10or delay any of the following:AB972,3,11111. A financial transaction on an account of the vulnerable adult.AB972,3,13122. A financial transaction on an account on which the vulnerable adult is a 13beneficiary, including a trust, guardianship, or conservatorship account.AB972,3,15143. A financial transaction on an account of a person suspected of perpetrating 15financial exploitation.AB972,3,2116(b) 1. Notwithstanding any provision of ch. 403, 404, or 410, a financial 17service provider may also refuse or delay a financial transaction under this 18subsection if an elder-adult-at-risk agency, adult-at-risk agency, or law enforcement 19agency provides information to the financial service provider demonstrating that it 20is reasonable to suspect that financial exploitation of a vulnerable adult may have 21occurred, may have been attempted, or is being attempted.AB972,4,4222. Except as ordered by a court, a financial service provider is not required to 23refuse or delay a financial transaction when provided with information by an elder-24adult-at-risk agency, adult-at-risk agency, or law enforcement agency alleging that 1financial exploitation of a vulnerable adult may have occurred, may have been 2attempted, or is being attempted, but may use its discretion to determine whether 3to refuse or delay a financial transaction based on the information available to the 4financial service provider.AB972,4,85(c) A financial service provider that refuses or delays a financial transaction 6based on reasonable cause to suspect that financial exploitation of a vulnerable 7adult may have occurred, may have been attempted, or is being attempted shall do 8all of the following:AB972,4,1191. Except with regard to an account administered by a financial institution in 10a fiduciary capacity, make a reasonable effort to notify, orally or in writing, one or 11more parties authorized to transact business on the account.AB972,4,13122. If the incident involves financial exploitation of a vulnerable adult, report 13the incident to the applicable elder-adult-at-risk agency or adult-at-risk agency.AB972,4,1614(d) No notice under this subsection is required to be provided to any party 15authorized to conduct business on the account if the party is the suspected 16perpetrator of financial exploitation.AB972,4,2217(e) Except as provided in par. (f), any refusal by a financial service provider to 18conduct a financial transaction and any delay by a financial service provider of a 19financial transaction as authorized by this subsection based on the financial service 20provider’s reasonable cause to suspect that financial exploitation of a vulnerable 21adult may have occurred, may have been attempted, or is being attempted expires 22upon the earliest of any of the following:AB972,5,211. The time when the financial service provider reasonably believes that the 2financial transaction will not result in financial exploitation of a vulnerable adult.AB972,5,632. The time when the customer requesting the transaction has been advised of 4a potential risk in the transaction and the customer has requested the transaction 5to continue as long as the customer is not the suspected perpetrator of financial 6exploitation.AB972,5,1373. Five business days after the date on which the financial service provider 8first refused or delayed the financial transaction, unless the division or an agency to 9which the incident was reported under par. (c) 2. requests that the financial service 10provider extends the refusal or delay, in which case the refusal or delay shall expire 11no more than 15 business days after the date on which the financial service 12provider first refused or delayed the financial transaction unless it is otherwise 13terminated or extended by the division or court order.AB972,5,1714(f) A court may enter an order extending the time that a financial service 15provider shall refuse or delay a financial transaction based on reasonable cause to 16suspect that financial exploitation of a vulnerable adult may have occurred, may 17have been attempted, or is being attempted.AB972,5,2018(g) Notwithstanding any provision of ch. 403, 404, or 410, a financial service 19provider, or an employee of a financial service provider, acting in good faith is 20immune from all criminal, civil, and administrative liability for any of the following:AB972,5,22211. Refusing or not refusing, or delaying or not delaying, a financial transaction 22under this subsection.AB972,6,212. Actions taken in furtherance of the determination made under subd. 1. if 2the determination was based on a reasonable suspicion.AB972,6,83(4) Financial service providers may refuse power of attorney. (a) 4Notwithstanding s. 244.20, a financial service provider may refuse to accept an 5acknowledged power of attorney if the principal is a vulnerable adult and the 6financial service provider has reasonable cause to suspect that the principal is or 7may be the victim or target of financial exploitation by the agent or person acting 8for or with the agent.AB972,6,139(b) A financial service provider, or an employee of a financial service provider, 10acting in good faith is immune from all criminal, civil, and administrative liability 11for refusing to accept a power of attorney or for accepting a power of attorney under 12this subsection and for actions taken in furtherance of that determination if the 13determination was based on reasonable suspicion.AB972,6,1414